Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.076

Department of social and health services—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1013.SL) ***

In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in the department of social and health services to the secretary; the secretary's executive assistant, if any; not to exceed six assistant secretaries, thirteen division directors, six regional directors; one confidential secretary for each of the above-named officers; not to exceed six bureau chiefs; and all superintendents of institutions of which the average daily population equals or exceeds one hundred residents.

[2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 402; 1997 c 386 s 1; 1993 c 281 s 22; 1980 c 73 s 1; 1970 ex.s. c 18 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.

Effective date—Severability—1970 ex.s. c 18: See notes following RCW 43.20A.010.